Illinois, session 104th, SB3746.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Governmental Ethics Act is amended 5by adding Section 4A-105.1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 420/4A-105.1 new)7    Sec. 4A-105.1. Executive Order provision superseded.8    (a) Executive Order 15-9 requires an additional economic 9interest disclosure for executive branch employees and, in 10Section IV(2), provides in part: "The Commission shall prepare 11forms or amend existing forms to be used to report the 12information described in this Section IV and shall provide 13those forms or amended forms to each individual required to 14report such information on or before April 1 of each year. Such 15statement shall be filed by each such individual with the 16Commission on or before May 1 of each year. The Commission 17shall ensure that all statements filed pursuant to this 18Section IV are made readily available for public inspection.".19    (b) Section IV of Executive Order 15-9 is superseded by 20subsection (c) of this Section and is of no force or effect.21    (c) Each State employee in the executive branch of State 22government that is required to file a statement of economic 23interest pursuant to this Article 4A shall also disclose the   SB3746- 2 -LRB104 20299 BDA 33750 b1following information:2        (1) the address and nature of interest in any real 3    property in which the employee or spouse or minor child of 4    the employee has a greater than 5% financial interest and 5    in which the State of Illinois is a tenant, lessor, or 6    otherwise has an ownership or other beneficial interest in 7    the real property, excepting the primary personal 8    residence of those individuals;9        (2) any nongovernmental position held, whether 10    compensated or not, with any business entity, non-profit 11    organization, labor group, educational institution, or 12    other entity of any type, together with the nature and 13    amount of any compensation; and14        (3) any litigation involving the State of Illinois or 15    any entity with a relationship with the State of Illinois, 16    where the employee is a party to, or has a financial 17    interest in, that litigation.18    The Secretary of State shall prepare forms or amend 19existing forms to be used to report the information described 20in this subsection and shall provide those forms or amended 21forms to each individual required to report such information 22at the same time as the forms under this Article 4A are 23provided. The information described in this subsection shall 24be filed with the Secretary of State in the same manner and at 25the same time for filing as the forms under this Article 4A. 26All information filed pursuant to this subsection shall be   SB3746- 3 -LRB104 20299 BDA 33750 b1made available for public inspection. Each State employee 2required to submit a statement pursuant to this subsection 3shall notify the Secretary of State in writing, as soon as 4practicable, of any material change in circumstance that might 5result in a change to the employee's disclosures filed 6pursuant to this subsection.